Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.600

Professional development supports.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall provide professional development supports to aid eligible providers in reaching the professional education and training standards adopted by the department. Professional development supports may include:

(a) Department-required trainings for child care providers conducted by department-approved trainers;

(b) Trainings for license-exempt family, friend, and neighbor child care providers conducted by department-approved trainers;

(c) Early achievers scholarships;

(d) Community-based training pathways and systems developed under RCW 43.216.755;

(e) Supporting a nonprofit organization that provides relationship-based professional development support to family, friend, and neighbor caregivers, child care centers, and licensed family home providers, and their work to help providers start their businesses; and

(f) Other professional development activities such as updating training content, data collection and reporting, trainer recruitment, retention, program monitoring, and trainings delivered by department-approved trainers on topics such as small business management, antibias and antiracist training, providing care for children with developmental disabilities, social-emotional learning, implementing inclusionary practices in early learning environments, infant and toddler care, dual language program development, and providing trauma-informed care.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "eligible provider" means: (a) An owner of a licensed or certified child care center, licensed or certified outdoor nature-based care, or licensed family home provider accepting state subsidy; (b) an employee of a licensed or certified child care center, licensed or certified outdoor nature-based care, or a licensed family home provider; (c) a contractor or provider of the early childhood education and assistance program or birth to three early childhood education and assistance program; or (d) an early achievers coach.

[ 2021 c 199 s 311.]

NOTES:

Short title—Findings—Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 199: See notes following RCW 43.216.770.